Idaho, session 2026, H0675.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 40-517, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
40-517. DEFINITIONS. As used in sections 40-515 through 40-520, Idaho
Code:
(1) "Broadband" means wide bandwidth communication transmissions
allowing capable of providing high-speed services, such as internet access
with an ability to simultaneously transport multiple signals and traffic
types at a minimum transmission speed of one hundred (100) megabits per sec-
ond for downloads and twenty (20) megabits per second for uploads.
(2) "Broadband infrastructure" means networks of deployed telecommu-
nications equipment, conduit, and technologies necessary to provide broad-
band and other advanced telecommunications services to wholesalers or end
users, including but not limited to private homes, businesses, commercial
establishments, schools, or and public institutions.
(3) "Broadband provider" means any entity that:
(a) Provides broadband services, including but not limited to a
telecommunications provider, cable service provider, broadband
provider, cellular provider, political subdivision that provides
broadband services, electric cooperative that provides broadband
services, electric utility that provides broadband services, state
government entity that provides broadband services, tribal government
that provides broadband services, or internet service provider; or
(b) Builds broadband infrastructure, including but not limited to a
port, nonprofit organization, or private-public partnership estab-
lished for the purpose of expanding broadband in the state.
(4) "Department" means the Idaho transportation department.
(5) "Dig Once Policy once policy" means a policy or practice that mini-
mizes the number and scale of excavations or construction and costs when in-
stalling broadband infrastructure in highway rights-of-way.
(6) "Highway" means a road that is part of the state highway system.
(7) "Longitudinal access" means access to or use of any part of a right-
of-way of a highway that extends generally parallel to the right-of-way for a
total of one hundred (100) or more linear feet.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.